Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the statewide jail industries board of directors.

(2) "City" means any city, town, or code city.

(3) "Cost accounting center" means a specific industry program operated under the private sector prison industry enhancement certification program as specified in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1761.

(4) "Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior, district, or municipal court of the state of Washington for payment of restitution to a victim, a statutorily imposed crime victims compensation fee, court costs, a county or interlocal drug fund, court appointed attorneys' fees and costs of defense, fines, and other legal financial obligations that are assessed as a result of a felony or misdemeanor conviction.

(5) "Free venture employer model industries" means an agreement between a city or county and a private sector business or industry or nonprofit organization to produce goods or services to both public and private sectors utilizing jail inmates whose compensation and supervision are provided by the private sector business or entity.

"Free venture customer model industries" means an agreement between a city or county and a private sector business or industry, or nonprofit organization to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with products or services currently produced, provided, or assembled by out-of-state or foreign suppliers utilizing jail inmates whose compensation and supervision are provided by the incarcerating facility or local jurisdiction.

(6) "Jail inmate" means a preconviction or postconviction resident of a city or county jail who is determined to be eligible to participate in jail inmate work programs according to the eligibility criteria of the work program.

(7) "Private sector prison industry enhancement certification program" means that program authorized by the United States justice assistance act of 1984, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1761.

(8) "Tax reduction industries" means those industries as designated by a city or county owning and operating such an industry to provide work training and employment opportunities for jail inmates, in total confinement, which reduce public support costs. The goods and services of these industries may be sold to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately used by a public agency or nonprofit organization. Surplus goods from these operations may be donated to government and nonprofit organizations.

[ 1995 c 154 s 1; 1993 c 285 s 2.]